Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Subarticle C. Board and Officers.

§ 81-27-6.201.
Voting securities held by state trust company.

Voting securities of a state trust company held by the state trust company in a fiduciary capacity under a will or trust, whether registered in its own name or in the name of its nominee, may not be voted in the election of directors or managers or on a matter affecting the compensation of directors, managers, officers, or employees of the state trust company in that capacity, unless:

Under the terms of the will or trust, the manner in which the voting securities are to be voted may be determined by a donor or beneficiary of the will or trust and the donor or beneficiary actually makes the determination in the matter at issue;

The terms of the will or trust expressly direct the manner in which the securities must be voted to the extent that no discretion is vested in the state trust company as fiduciary; or

The securities are voted solely by a cofiduciary that is not an affiliate of the state trust company, as if the cofiduciary were the sole fiduciary.

Voting securities of a state trust company that cannot be voted under this section are considered to be authorized but unissued for purposes of determining the procedures for and results of the affected vote.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.202.
Bylaws.

Each state trust company shall adopt bylaws and may amend its bylaws from time to time for the purposes and in accordance with the procedures set forth in the Mississippi Business Corporation Act.

A limited liability trust company in which management is retained by the participants is not required to adopt bylaws if provisions required by law to be contained in the bylaws are contained in the articles of association or the participation agreement. If a limited liability trust company has adopted bylaws which designate each full liability participant, the limited liability trust company shall file with the commissioner a copy of the bylaws. Solely that portion of the bylaws designating each full liability participant shall be a public record.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.203.
Board of directors, managers or managing participants.

The board of a state trust company must consist of not fewer than five (5) or more than twenty-five (25) directors, managers, or managing participants, the majority of whom must be residents of this state. Except for a limited liability trust company in which management has been retained by its participants, the principal executive officer of the state trust company is a member of the board. The principal executive officer acting in the capacity of board member is the board’s presiding officer unless the board elects a different presiding officer to perform the duties as designated by the board.

Unless the commissioner consents otherwise in writing, a person may not serve as director, manager, or managing participant of a state trust company if:

The state trust company incurs an unreimbursed loss attributable to a charged-off obligation of or holds a judgment against the person or an entity that was controlled by the person at the time of funding and at the time of default on the loan that gave rise to the judgment or charged-off obligation;

The person has been convicted of a felony; or

The person has violated any provision of state law relating to loan of trust funds and purchase or sale of trust property by the trustee, and the violation has not been corrected.

If a state trust company other than a limited liability trust company operated by managing participants does not elect directors or managers before the sixty-first day after the date of its regular annual meeting, the commissioner may appoint a conservator under Article 6 of this chapter to operate the state trust company and elect directors or managers, as appropriate. If the conservator is unable to locate or elect persons willing and able to serve as directors or managers, the commissioner may close the state trust company for liquidation.

A vacancy on the board that reduces the number of directors, managers, or managing participants to fewer than five (5) must be filed not later than the thirtieth day after the date the vacancy occurs. A limited liability trust company with fewer than five (5) managing participants must add one or more new participants or elect a board of managers of not fewer than five (5) persons to resolve the vacancy. After thirty (30) days after the date the vacancy occurs, the commissioner may appoint a conservator under Article 6 of this chapter to operate the state trust company and elect a board of not fewer than five (5) persons to resolve the vacancy. If the conservator is unable to locate or elect five (5) persons willing and able to serve as directors or managers, the commissioner may close the state trust company for liquidation.

Before each term to which a person is elected to serve as a director or manager of a state trust company, or annually for a person who is a managing participant, the person shall submit an affidavit for filing in the minutes of the state trust company stating that the person, to the extent applicable:

Accepts the position and is not disqualified from serving in the position;

Will not violate or knowingly permit an officer, director, manager, managing participant, or employee of the state trust company to violate any law applicable to the conduct of business of the state trust company; and

Will diligently perform the duties of the position.

An advisory director or manager is not considered a director if the advisory director or manager:

Is not elected by the shareholders or participants of the state trust company;

Does not vote on matters before the board or a committee of the board and is not counted for purposes of determining a quorum of the board or committee; and

Provides solely general policy advice to the board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.204.
Required board meetings.

The board of a state trust company shall hold at least one (1) regular meeting each quarter. At each regular meeting the board shall review and approve the minutes of the prior meeting and review the operations, activities, and financial condition of the state trust company. The board may designate committees from among its members to perform these duties and approve or disapprove the committees’ reports at each regular meeting. All actions of the board must be recorded in its minutes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.205.
Officers.

The board shall annually appoint the officers of the state trust company, who serve at the pleasure of the board. The state trust company must have a principal executive officer primarily responsible for the execution of board policies and operation of the state trust company and an officer responsible for the maintenance and storage of all corporate books and records of the state trust company and for required attestation of signatures. These positions may not be held by the same person. The board may appoint other officers of the state trust company as the board considers necessary.

Unless expressly authorized by a resolution of the board recorded in its minutes, an officer or employee may not create or dispose of a state trust company asset or create or incur a liability on behalf of the state trust company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.206.
Certain criminal offenses.

An officer, director, manager, managing participant, employee, shareholder, or participant of a state trust company commits an offense if the person knowingly:

Conceals information or a fact, or removes, destroys, or conceals a book or record of the state trust company for the purpose of concealing information or a fact from the commissioner or an agent of the commissioner; or

For the purpose of concealing, removes or destroys any book or record of the state trust company that is material to a pending or anticipated legal or administrative proceeding.

An officer, director, manager, managing participant, or employee of a state trust company commits an offense if the person knowingly makes a false entry in the books or records or in any report or statement of the state trust company.

Any person committing an offense under this section is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or imprisoned in the State Penitentiary for not more than one (1) year, or both.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.207.
Transactions with management and affiliates.

Without the prior approval of a disinterested majority of the board recorded in the minutes, or if a disinterested majority cannot be obtained the prior written approval of the commissioner, a state trust company may not directly or indirectly:

Sell or lease an asset of the state trust company to an officer, director, manager, managing participant, or principal shareholder or participant of the state trust company or an affiliate of the state trust company; or

Purchase or lease an asset in which an officer, director, manager, managing participant, or principal shareholder or participant of the state trust company or an affiliate of the state trust company has an interest; or

Subject to Section 81-27-5.201, extend credit to an officer, director, manager, managing participant, or principal shareholder or participant of the state trust company or an affiliate of the state trust company.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a lease transaction described in subsection (a)(2) of this section involving real property may not be consummated, renewed, or extended without the prior written approval of the commissioner. For purposes of this subsection only, an affiliate of the state trust company does not include a subsidiary of the state trust company.

Subject to Section 81-27-5.201, a state trust company may not directly or indirectly extend credit to an employee, officer, director, manager, managing participant, or principal shareholder or participant of the state trust company or an affiliate of the state trust company, unless the extension of credit:

Is made on substantially the same terms, including interest rates and collateral, as those prevailing at the time for comparable transactions by the state trust company with persons who are not employees, officers, directors, managers, managing participants, or principal shareholders, participants or affiliates of the state trust company; and

Does not involve more than the normal risk of repayment or present other unfavorable features; and

The state trust company follows credit underwriting procedures that are not less stringent than those applicable to comparable transactions by the state trust company with persons who are not employees, officers, directors, managers, managing participants, or principal shareholders, participants or affiliates of the state trust company.

An officer, director, manager, or managing participant of the state trust company who knowingly participates in or permits a violation of this section is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or imprisoned in the State Penitentiary for not more than one (1) year, or both.

The commissioner may adopt rules or regulations to administer and carry out this section, including rules or regulations to establish limits, requirements, or exemptions other than those specified by this section for particular categories of transactions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.208.
Fiduciary responsibility.

The board of a state trust company is responsible for the proper exercise of fiduciary powers by the state trust company and each matter pertinent to the exercise of fiduciary powers, including:

The determination of policies;

The investment and disposition of property held in a fiduciary capacity; and

The direction and review of the actions of each officer, employee, and committee used by the state trust company in the exercise of its fiduciary powers.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.209.
Record keeping.

A state trust company shall keep its fiduciary records separate and distinct from other records of the state trust company. The fiduciary records must contain all material information relative to each account as appropriate under the circumstances.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.210.
Bonding requirements.

The board of a state trust company shall require protection and indemnity for clients in reasonable amounts established by rules or regulations adopted under this article, against dishonesty, fraud, defalcation, forgery, theft, and other similar insurable losses, with corporate insurance or surety companies:

Authorized to do business in this state; or

Acceptable to the commissioner and otherwise lawfully permitted to issue the coverage against those losses in this state.

Except as otherwise provided by rule or regulation, coverage required under subsection (a) of this section must include each director, manager, managing participant, officer, and employee of the state trust company without regard to whether the person receives salary or other compensation.

A state trust company may apply to the commissioner for permission to eliminate the bonding requirement of this section for a particular individual. The commissioner shall approve the application if the commissioner finds that the bonding requirement is unnecessary or burdensome. Unless the application presents novel or unusual questions, the commissioner shall approve the application or set the application for hearing not later than the sixty-first day after the date the commissioner considers the application complete and accepted for filing.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.211.
Reports of apparent crime.

A trust company that is the victim of a robbery, has a shortage of corporate or fiduciary funds in excess of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or is the victim of an apparent or suspected misapplication of its corporate or fiduciary funds or property in any amount by a director, manager, managing participant, officer, or employee shall report such robbery, shortages or apparent or suspected misapplication to the commissioner within forty-eight (48) hours after the time it is discovered. The initial report may be oral if the report is promptly confirmed in writing. The trust company or a director, manager, managing participant, officer, employee, or agent is not subject to liability for defamation or another charge resulting from information supplied in the report.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.